Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-731
Retired judge; temporary duty; expenses.

A retired judge on temporary duty shall be reimbursed for his or her expenses at the same rate as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees but shall submit a request for payment or reimbursement in the manner provided in section 24-733.

Laws 1974, LB 832, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 37;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 3.